792 • CHAPTER 32


 President Clinton responded to the 1994 election results by shifting his own activist agenda conspicuously to the center—announcing his own plan to cut taxes and balance the budget. But the presidential politics of 1996 made compromise between the president and Congress very difficult. In November 1995 and again in January 1996, the federal government literally shut down for several days because the president and Congress could not agree on a budget. Republican leaders refused to pass a “continuing resolution” (to allow government operations to continue during negotiations) in hopes of pressuring the president to agree to their terms. That proved to be an epic political blunder. Public opinion turned quickly and powerfully against the Republican leadership and much of its agenda. Newt Gingrich emerged as one of the most unpopular political leaders in the nation, while President Clinton slowly improved his standing in public opinion polls. By the time the 1996 campaign began in earnest, President Clinton was in a commanding position to win reelection. Unopposed for the Democratic nomination, he faced a Republican opponent—Senator Robert Dole of Kansas—who inspired little enthusiasm even within his own party. Clinton benefited from the disastrous errors by congressional Republicans in 1995 and early 1996. But his greatest strength came from the remarkable success of the American economy and the marked reduction in the federal deficit. Like Reagan in 1984, he could campaign as the champion of peace, prosperity, and national well-being.







































































Candidate (Party)
Bill Clinton
(Democratic)
Robert Dole
(Republican)
Ross Perot
(Reform)


Electoral Vote


Popular Vote (%)
47,401,185
(49.3)
39,197,469
(40.7)
8,085,294
(8.4)


 49% of electorate voting THE ELECTION OF 1996 Ross Perot received many fewer votes in 1996 than he had in 1992, and President Clinton came much closer than he had four years earlier to winning a majority of the popular vote. Once again, Clinton defeated his Republican opponent, this time Robert Dole, by a decisive margin in both the popular and electoral votes. • After the 1994 Republican landslide in the congressional elections, Bill Clinton had seemed permanently weakened. What explains his political revival?

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 793 

 In a flurry of activity in the spring and summer of 1996, Congress passed several important bills. The most dramatic was a welfare reform bill that ended the fifty-year federal guarantee of assistance to families with dependent children and turned most of the responsibility for allocating federal welfare funds to the states. Most of all, it shifted the bulk of welfare benefits away from those without jobs and toward low-wage workers. Clinton’s buoyant campaign flagged slightly in the last weeks, but the president nevertheless received just over 49 percent of the popular vote to Dole’s 41 percent; Ross Perot, running now as the candidate of what he called the Reform Party, received just over 8 percent of the vote. Clinton won 379 electoral votes to Dole’s 159; Perot won none, as was Clinton Reelected the case in the 1992 election. But the Democrats failed to regain either house of Congress.

Clinton Triumphant and Embattled
 The first Democratic president to win two terms as president since Franklin Roosevelt, Bill Clinton began his second administration with serene confidence. He proposed a relatively modest domestic agenda. He negotiated effectively with the Republican leadership on a plan for a balanced budget, which passed with much fanfare late in 1997. By the end of 1998, the federal budget was generating its first surplus in thirty years. Clinton’s renewed popularity was critical to his political survival in the turbulent year that followed, when the most serious crisis of his presidency suddenly erupted. Clinton had been the target of accusations of corruption and scandal since his first weeks in office: the investigation into Whitewater, charges of corruption against members of his cabinet and staff, accusations of illegalities in financing his 1996 campaign, and a civil suit for sexual harassment filed early in his first term by a former Arkansas state employee, Paula Jones. In early 1998, inquiries associated with the Paula Jones case led to charges that the president had had a sexual relationship with a twenty-two-year-old White House intern, Monica Lewinsky. The most damaging charge was that he had lied about it in his deposition before Jones’s attorneys. Those revelations produced a new investigation by the independent counsel in the Whitewater case, Kenneth Starr, a former judge and official in the Reagan Justice Department. Clinton forcefully denied the charges, and a majority of the public strongly backed him. His popularity soared to record levels and remained high throughout the year that followed. In the meantime, a federal judge dismissed the Paula Jones case, which had launched the scandal. But the scandal revived again with great force in August 1998, when Lewinsky struck a deal with the independent counsel and testified about her relationship with Clinton. Starr then subpoenaed Clinton himself, who—faced with the prospect of speaking The Starr Report to a grand jury—finally admitted that he and Lewinsky had had what he called an “improper relationship.” A few weeks later, Starr submitted a lengthy and salacious report to Congress on the results of his investigation, recommending that Congress impeach the president.

Impeachment, Acquittal, and Resurgence
 On December 19, 1998, the House, voting on strictly partisan lines, narrowly approved two counts of impeachment: lying to the grand jury and obstructing justice. The matter then moved to the Senate, where a trial of the president—the first since the trial of Andrew Johnson in 1868—began in early January. It ended with a decisive acquittal of the president. Neither of the charges attracted even a majority of the votes, let alone the two-thirds necessary for conviction.

794 • CHAPTER 32


 Still, the trial dampened public support for the president and stiffened congressional opposition to any of his initiatives. Indeed, the last two years of the Clinton presidency were relatively quiet. The president had no real hope of major domestic achievements in the face of a hostile Republican Congress. Overseas, however, he was more active. In 1999, the president faced another crisis in the Balkans. This time, the conflict Kosovo involved a province of Serbian-dominated Yugoslavia—Kosovo—most of whose residents were Albanian Muslims. A savage civil war erupted there in 1998 between Kosovo nationalists and Serbians. In May 1999, NATO forces—dominated and led by the United States—began a major bombing campaign against the Serbians, which after little more than a week led the leader of Yugoslavia, Slobodan Milosevic, to agree to a ceasefire. Serbian troops withdrew from Kosovo entirely, replaced by NATO peacekeeping forces. A precarious peace returned to the region. Buoyed by his success overseas and a rising economy, Clinton actually finished his eight years in office with his popularity higher than it had been when he had begun. No president in the years since has experienced the same approval ratings. Indeed, despite politicians’ use of new technology and polling data to connect with the public, the relationship between the elected and the voter has steadily deteriorated.

The Election of 2000
 The 2000 presidential election was one of the most extraordinary in American history— not because of the campaign that preceded it but because of the sensational controversy over its results, which preoccupied the nation for more than five weeks after the actual voting. The two men who had been the front-runners for their parties’ nominations a year before the election captured these nominations with only slight difficulty: Republican George W. Bush, son of the former president and a second-term governor of Texas, and Democrat Al Gore, former Tennessee senator and vice president under Clinton. Both men ran cautious, centrist campaigns. In the congressional races, Republicans maintained control of the House of Representatives by a scant five seats, while the Senate split evenly between Democrats and Republicans. (Among the victors in the Senate races was First Lady Hillary Rodham Clinton, who won in New York.) In the presidential race, Gore won the national popular vote by the thin margin of about 540,000 votes out of Florida Disputed about 100 million cast (a difference of 0.5 percent). But on election night, both candidates remained short of the 270 electoral votes needed for victory because the Florida results were too close to call. After a mandatory recount over the next two days, Bush led Gore in the state by fewer than 300 votes. The technology of voting soon became central to the dispute. The Gore campaign asked for hand recounts in three critical counties, which the Florida Supreme Court unanimously supported. The battle over the ballots continued between the candidates in the news and the courts until the U.S. Supreme Court ruled on December 12. Voting 5 to 4, along ideological lines, the conservative majority ruled that the Florida Supreme Court’s order for a recount was unconstitutional; insisted that according to U.S. Code any revised recount order be completed by December 12 (the same day that the ruling was issued and therefore impossible to execute); and argued that the standards for evaluating punch-card ballots were too arbitrary and unfair to withstand constitutional scrutiny. With Florida’s results certified, Bush’s victory in Florida—and thus nationally—stood.

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 795 







































































Candidate (Party)


Electoral Vote


Popular Vote (%)


Al Gore
(Democratic)
George W. Bush
(Republican)




51,003,894
(48)
50,459,211
(48)




 51% of electorate voting THE ELECTION OF 2000 The 2000 presidential election was one of the closest and most controversial in American history. It also starkly revealed a new pattern of party strength, which had been developing over the previous decade. Democrats swept the Northeast and most of the industrial Midwest and carried all the states of the Pacific Coast. Republicans swept the South, the plains states, and the mountain states (with the exception of New Mexico) and held on to a few traditional Republican strongholds in the Midwest. • Compare this map to those of earlier elections, in particular the election of 1896 (Chapter 19). How did the pattern of party support change over the course of the twentieth century?

The Presidency of George W. Bush
 George W. Bush assumed the presidency in January 2001 burdened by both the controversies surrounding his election and the widespread perception, even among some of his own supporters, that he was ill-prepared for the office. Nevertheless, Bush moved forcefully to enact an ambitious and controversial agenda. Having campaigned as a moderate, Bush spent his first term as president governing as a staunch conservative and relying on the most conservative members of his party for support. He won passage of the largest tax cut in American history—$1.35 trillion. Critics noted that the massive tax cuts of 2001 went disproportionately to wealthy Bush Tax Cuts Americans, reflecting the view of White House economists that the best way to ensure growth was to put money into the hands of people most likely to invest. Bush’s other major domestic accomplishment was a controversial education reform bill, known as “No Child Left Behind,” which tied federal funding in schools to the success of students in taking standardized tests. Still other proposals—an effort to privatize some aspects of the Social Security system, for example—never attracted significant support in Congress. Nonetheless, for most of the first three years of his presidency, George W. Bush was revered by many Americans because of his resolute stance against terrorism. Even the Iraq War, which began in 2003 and initially enjoyed widespread backing, helped sustain his popularity for a time.

796 • CHAPTER 32


 As the 2004 election approached, Karl Rove, the president’s political adviser, encouraged the administration to take increasingly conservative positions to mobilize the party’s conservative constituency in what almost everyone agreed was likely to be a very close election. The electorate was divided almost evenly throughout the campaign, and in the end turnout proved decisive. Although the Democrats turned out in much higher numbers than they had in 2000, the increase in the Republican vote was even larger. Bush won a narrow victory, with 51 percent of the popular vote and an electoral vote margin of 35. The 2004 election was one of the last successful moments in the Bush administration. The public’s recent turn against the war in Iraq contributed to the rapidly declining approval ratings of the president himself—ratings that by mid-2008 had reached the lowest level of presidential approval in the history of polling. Perhaps even more Hurricane Katrina damaging to Bush’s popularity was the government’s weak response to Hurricane Katrina, a Category 3 hurricane of tremendous force that ravaged the Gulf Coast of Louisiana and Mississippi in late August 2005. The storm leveled many communities along the coast and crippled the city of New Orleans. Some of the levees that protected the city failed, causing massive flooding and destruction. While local, state, and federal governance fumbled the initial evacuation and recovery of southern Louisiana, the administration took the brunt of the blame. The Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) failed to handle the disaster effectively and arguably made it worse. The political fallout from Hurricane Katrina, along with scandals in the Justice Department, revelations of violations of civil liberties, revulsion from aggressive interviewing tactics used against suspected terrorists, and declining e­conomic prospects, culminating in a disastrous financial crisis beginning in early 2008—all contributed to the growing unpopularity of the president. Bush managed some significant victories despite these setbacks. He won confirmation of two justices that he proposed for the Supreme Court: John Roberts, who succeeded William Rehnquist as chief justice; and Samuel Alito, who succeeded the retiring Sandra Day O’Connor. Both were fierce conservatives, inspiring hopes among some and fears among others that the Court would veer more sharply to the political right.

The Election of 2008
 The 2008 presidential election was the first since 1952 that did not include an incumbent president or vice president. Both parties began the campaign with large fields of candidates, but by the spring of 2008 the contest had narrowed considerably. Senator John McCain of Arizona emerged from the early primaries with his nomination ensured. In the Democratic race, the primaries quickly eliminated all but two ­candidates: Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton of New York, the former first lady, and Senator Barack Obama of Illinois, a young, charismatic politician and the son of an African father and a white American mother. As the first woman and the first African American to have a realistic chance of being elected president, Clinton and Obama attracted great enthusiasm. The passions driving both campaigns led to a primary contest that lasted much longer than usual. Not until the last primaries in June was it clear that Obama would be the nominee. As the nomination campaigns were heating up, a series of financial problems erupted that imperiled the state of the economy. Indeed, by early 2008 the nation confronted its worst financial crisis since the Great Depression. The problem had

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 797 

 several causes. For years, financial institutions had been developing new credit instruments intended to make borrowing easier and cheaper, which had lured millions of people into taking on large and risky mortgages. One such instrument, called an adjustable rate mortgage (ARM), offered homebuyers mortgages with initially low interest rates that would increase in later years. Other loans, called “jumbo loans,” extended credit to people who lacked the financial means needed to pay them back. These new business practices were made possible with the repeal in 1999 of a centerpiece of New Deal legislation, the Glass-Steagall Act. Glass-Steagall had been passed in 1933 to prevent irresponsible banking practices by mandating layers of government oversight designed to catch fraud or risky investment strategies. Consumers responded to these new means of financing home purchases by snapping them up. Not surprisingly, the sale of houses, many of which were based on these risky mortgages, soared for a while, causing a “housing bubble”—a rapid rise in housing prices fueled by high demand. But the bubble eventually burst. The price of homes soon leveled off and even dipped. Those with ARMs saw them reset at much higher rates and struggled to make the higher payments. They and many owners of jumbo loans sought to sell their homes but couldn’t because the market value of the home had often sunk below the value of the mortgages held, forcing some to walk away from their property and default on their loans. Foreclosures skyrocketed across the country. Many of the nation’s largest banks had invested heavily in the securities that backed these risky loans; now, with the collapse of the housing market, they lost vast sums of money. The so-called Great Recession of 2008, influenced by the loan crisis, also pushed down wages and triggered widespread job layoffs. The increased unemployment Great Recession of 2008 rate further accelerated the downward economic spiral. Many Americans simply could not meet basic financial obligations such as the repayment of home, car, or school loans or credit card debt. There was also less money available for investing, or economic growth. Predictably, the Great Recession fueled outrage among those most affected: blue-collar and trades workers, manufacturers, and the poor. Popular anger surfaced in art, literature, and especially contemporary music. Rap, one of the newest and most successful forms of popular music, chronicled lives of despair and called for economic change. (See “Patterns of Popular Culture: Rap.”) By mid-September 2008, the financial crisis suggested an economy spinning out of control. Secretary of the Treasury Henry Paulson, supported by other economic leaders, stepped in. He proposed a massive use of federal funds to help the government bail out banks that were failing. Both the Bush administration and eventually the Obama administration won congressional support for $750 billion in the form of the Troubled Asset Relief Program (TARP) to shore up the tottering financial institutions. The bailout kept the economy from collapsing, but it remained very weak for several years, with exceptionally high unemployment rates. This extraordinary crisis formed the backdrop against which the two presidential candidates fought out the last two months of their campaign. Neither offered clear or convincing solutions to the crisis, but most voters came to believe that Obama would likely be a better steward of the economy than McCain. Obama benefited both from the unpopularity of George W. Bush and from his success at persuading voters that McCain would continue Bush’s policies. Obama held on to—and indeed increased— his lead through late September and October, helped by a heavily financed and highly disciplined campaign.

PATTERNS OF POPULAR CULTURE


Rap
 The long musical lineage of rap includes elements of the disco and street funk of the 1970s; of the fast-talking jive of black radio DJs in the 1950s; of the onstage patter of Cab Calloway and other African American stars of the first half of the twentieth century. It contains reminders of tap and break dancing—even of the boxing-ring poetry of Muhammad Ali. Rap’s most important element is its words. Rap is as much a form of language as a form of music. It bears a distant resemblance to some traditions of African American pulpit oratory, which also included forms of spoken song. It draws from some of the verbal traditions of urban black street life, including the “dozens”—a ritualized trading of insults particularly popular among young black men. But rap is also the product of a distinctive place and time: the South Bronx in the 1970s and 1980s and the hip-hop culture that was born there and that soon dominated the appearance and public behavior of many ­ young black males. “Hip hop is how you walk, talk, live, see, act, feel,” said one Bronx hiphopper. Some elements of hip-hop culture faded, and by the 1990s the most popular element of hip-hop culture was rap, which had by then been developing for nearly twenty years. Beginning in the early 1970s, Bronx DJs began setting up their equipment on neighborhood streets and staging block parties, where they not only played records but also put on shows of their own—performances that featured spoken rhymes, jazzy phrases, and pointed comments about the audience, the neighborhood, and themselves. Gradually, the DJs began to bring “rappers” into shows— young men who developed the DJ style into a much more elaborate form of performance, 798 •

 usually accompanied by dancing. As rap grew more popular in the inner city, record promoters began signing some of its new stars. In 1979, the Sugarhill Gang’s “Rapper’s Delight” became the first rap single to be played on mainstream commercial radio and the first to become a major hit. In the early 1980s, RunDMC became the first national rap superstars. From there, rap moved quickly to become one of the most popular and commercially successful forms of popular music. In the 1990s and early 2000s, rap recordings routinely sold millions of copies. Rap has taken many forms. There have been white rappers (Eminem, House of Pain), female rappers (Missy Elliott, Queen Latifah), even religious rappers and children’s rappers. But it has always been primarily a product of the young male culture of the inner city, and some of the most successful rap has conveyed the frustration and anger that these men have felt about their lives—“a voice for the ­oppressed people,” one rap artist said, “that in many other ways don’t have a voice.” In 1982, the rap group Grandmaster Flash and the Furious Five released a rap called “The Message,” a searing description of the ghetto and the lack of educational and economic ­opportunities. In the late 1980s, the Compton and Watts neighborhoods of Los Angeles—two of the most distressed minority communities in the city—produced their own style, known as West Coast rap, with such groups as Ice Cube, Ice-T, Tupac Shakur, and Snoop Doggy Dog. West Coast rap often had a harsh, angry character, and at its extremes (the so-called gangsta’ rap), it could be strikingly violent and highly provocative. Scandals erupted over controversial lyrics—Ice-T’s “Cop Killer,” which some

KANYE WEST
Testifying to the continued popularity of rap, as of 2014 rapper Kanye West remains one of the bestselling artists of all time, having sold well over 21 million albums and 66 million digital downloads in the United States alone. Time magazine has named West one of the 100 most influential people in the world. He is a rapper, songwriter, record producer, film director, entrepreneur, and fashion designer. (© Getty Images Entertainment/Getty Images) 
 critics believed advocated murdering police; and the sexually explicit lyrics of 2 Live Crew and other groups, which critics accused of ­advocating violence against women. But it was not just the lyrics that caused the furor. Rap artists were almost all products of tough inner-city neighborhoods, and the rough-edged styles many took with them into the public eye made many people uncomfortable. Some rappers got caught up in highly publicized trouble with the law. Several—­ including two of rap’s biggest stars, Tupac Shakur and Notorious B.I.G.—were murdered. The business of rap, particularly the confrontational business style of Death Row Records (founded by Dr. Dre, a veteran of the first major West Coast rap group NWA), was a source of public controversy as well. These controversies at times unfairly dominated the image of rap as a whole. Some rap is angry and cruel, as are many of the realities of the world from which it comes. But much of it is explicitly positive, some of it deliberately gentle. Chuck D and other successful rappers use their music to exhort young black men to avoid drugs and crime, to take responsibility

 for their children, to get an education. And the form, if not the content, of the original rappers has spread widely through American culture. Rap came to dominate the music charts in America, and its styles made their way onto Sesame Street and other children’s shows, into television commercials, Hollywood films, and the everyday language of millions of people, young and old, black and white. It became ­another of the arresting, innovative African American musical traditions that have shaped American culture for more than a century.

•


UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, & EVALUATE
 1. What other African American musical

 forms have helped shape American ­popular culture? 2. If rap is so closely associated with the ­inner-city culture where it originated, what accounts for its widespread popularity and commercial success? What other forms or styles of popular music enjoy a popularity that extends far beyond its cultural origins? 3. Do you think rap’s popularity will ­endure? Why or why not? • 799

800 • CHAPTER 32




























21 11






































Candidate (Party)


Electoral Vote


Popular Vote (%)


Barack Obama
(Democrat)




69,297,997
(53.7)


 John McCain (Republican)



59,597,520
(46.2)


THE ELECTION OF 2008
The election of 2008 produced a decisive victory for Barack Obama. Democrats won majorities in both the House and the Senate, only to see the Republicans win a majority of the House two years later. • Compare this map to the election of 2000 map. Which states did Bush win that went to Obama in 2008? 
 On November 4, 2008, Barack Obama won a decisive victory, winning the popular vote 53 percent to 46 percent and the electoral vote by an even larger margin. Obama became the first Democratic candidate since Lyndon Johnson to win so large a victory.

Obama and His Opponents
 The global exuberance that Obama’s election created in 2008 did not linger for long. The first two years of his presidency coincided with the worst period of the economic crisis. But large supportive Democratic majorities in both houses of Congress strengthened Obama’s ability to enact broad reforms. During those years, Obama passed a large stimulus package of $800 billion to support state and local budgets, public works, and other investments that he hoped would generate economic growth. He and his congressional allies also succeeded in passing significant financial regulations that were designed to avoid another crisis like the one that began in 2008. Even more important, he oversaw the passage of the Affordable Affordable Care Act Care Act, a broad health-care bill that would ensure that almost all Americans would have access to insurance, regardless of their means. Yet Obama’s legislation, and especially his health-care initiative, triggered fear among many Republicans about a federal government becoming too powerful and overstepping its limits. Indeed, only one Republican congressman supported the health-care bill. For Obama, who had built much of his presidential bid around the idea of bipartisanship and conciliation, the polarization of the two parties was a significant setback. Many Republican state’s attorneys sued to stop the health bill. Judges were divided as to whether the bill was constitutional, and only favorable rulings by the Supreme Court in June 2012 and 2015 preserved it. The 2010 midterm congressional campaigns were dominated by the emergence of a new Tea Party social movement—the Tea Party movement, a vigorous conservative effort to reduce the national debt, lower taxes, and limit the role of government. This broad movement attracted mostly white men and women, largely from the middle class. It viewed

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 801 

 Obama and his peers as dangerous enemies to a stronger, more prosperous America. It helped send a large majority of anti-Obama Republicans to the House and reduced the majority of Democrats in the Senate. For the next two years, President Obama struggled to get proposals passed by Congress because nearly every Republican summarily rejected them. In September 2011, another movement emerged—Occupy Wall Street Occupy Wall Street (OWS). But this movement preached a radically different agenda than the Tea Party movement. Significantly smaller and younger than the Tea Party, OWS argued for stricter financial regulation, progressive taxation, stronger support for unions, more resources to reduce unemployment, assaults on economic inequality, and the end of what it believed were unnecessary and failed wars. Its rallying cry was “We are the 99%,” referring to the growing gap of income equality between the richest 1 percent and the rest of Americans. They symbolically demonstrated their grievances by camping in Zuccotti Park in the Wall Street area of lower Manhattan. Soon after, similar demonstrations took place in many other places in the United States and around the world. OWS, never a broad-based popular movement, quickly lost steam and was largely extinguished by 2013. Yet it served as an emblem of popular concern over the unsteady recent history of the economy and the ability of politicians to solve crises in general.

Obama and the Challenge of Governing
 The election of 2012—the most expensive campaign in history—pitted President Obama against Mitt Romney, a former governor of Massachusetts. The campaign was not only expensive but also raucous and at times quite angry. As election day neared, the presidential debates in October became the most important part of the campaign. In the first debate, most viewers saw President Obama as tired and uninterested—a stigma that gave Romney a significant boost in the polls. But in the next two, a more energetic and commanding Obama captured support and slowly built a lead. Still, the race was up in the air until the very end. The polls showed Obama with a persistent lead during the final weeks of the campaign, but only a razor-thin one. Enormous amounts of campaign money and effort flooded into the few states that were still up for grabs—among them Ohio, Virginia, Florida, Wisconsin, Iowa, and New Hampshire. On election night, it became clear that these states had tilted toward Obama in the last few days. He won all of them. His victory was close in popular votes, but his electoral college votes gave him a large lead with 332 votes. The Democrats also won several new senators, giving the party a majority. The House of Representatives remained Republican, but the majority was now smaller. The political gridlock of Obama’s presidency continued after his reelection. Many of his initiatives faced serious obstacles or simply did not come to pass. A major disappointment for Obama and his supporters involved the failure to enact meaningful gun control measures despite a series of horrific shootings occurring during his Sandy Hook Shooting terms in office, including the shooting of twenty children and six adults at the Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Connecticut, on December 14, 2012. Despite the president’s promise to exert “whatever power this office holds” to generate such gun control reform, the Congress resisted enacting any such legislation. The National Rifle Association and the conservative wing of the Republican Party successfully warded off any change on the federal level of the right of Americans to buy and use guns. The gridlock of the House also dashed any hopes President Obama had of gaining a deal on immigration. After his second inaugural, Obama and his strategists hoped to cement their gains among the Latino population revealed in the general election. Many Republicans, as well, believed that their party should reach out to this growing sector

802 • CHAPTER 32


 of the population by pushing through an immigration reform bill. On June 27, 2013, the Senate, in a rare show of bipartisanship, passed the Border Security, Economic Opportunity, and Immigration Modernization Act of 2013 as a comprehensive package of provisions, including a path to U.S. citizenship for illegal immigrants already in the country. But powerful conservative Republican opposition in the House, based largely on the idea that illegal immigrants should not be granted citizenship, doomed the bill and it died in Congress. Obama responded by issuing an executive order, through which he sought to implement many of the provisions of the bill over the howls of protest from House Republicans. A federal judge eventually intervened in December 2014, ruling that the president’s actions were unconstitutional. This decision, along with lawsuits filed by individual states, has effectively killed the reform, at least for the immediate future. The fate of the immigration bill embodied the challenge of governing in the early twenty-first century. President Obama had whipped up popular support for a bill tackling a pressing social issue and rallied the Senate to pass it—only to see it twist in the wind of partisan debate in the House and eventually die there. As Clinton and Bush had before him, Obama confronted the painful realities of political leadership in modern America, where fealty to political ideology often trumped any desire to compromise with a member of the opposite party or even with those in the same party.

SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY IN
THE NEW ECONOMY
 The last three decades have seen remarkable changes in American life—some a result of the end of the Cold War, some the changing character of the American population, and some a product of a rapidly evolving culture. But most of these changes were at least in part a product of the dramatic transformation of American trade and industry. Indeed, this “new economy” represented a profound shift in the nation’s financial history. Throughout much of the twentieth century, manufacturing had powered the nation’s economy. Making cars, rubber, steel, and airplanes, for example, had provided many workers with steady jobs and decent wages and benefits as well as entry into the middle class. But in the face of the sluggish growth and persistent inflation of the last decades of the 1900s, many American corporations began making drastic changes in the way they ran their businesses. They invested heavily in new technology to make themselves more efficient and productive and, more significantly, aggressively reduced their labor costs, which were among the highest in the world and which many economists and business leaders believed had made the United States uncompetitive against the emerging economies that relied on low-wage workers. Businesses now took a much harder line against unions. And nonunion companies became more successful in staving off unionization drives. Some companies actually moved their operations to areas of the country where unions were weak and wages low—the American South and Midwest in particular. Others simply relocated much of their production out of the United States, to such nations as Mexico and China, where there were large available pools of unorganized cheap labor. At the same time, the digital revolution took hold. The rapid development of the personal computer and the Internet profoundly reshaped how companies operated and organized themselves, rewarding in particular college-educated workers skilled in software design and application. It also redefined how people communicated, worked, shopped, and spent their free time.

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 803 

The Digital Revolution
 The dramatic growth in the use of computers and other digital devices was among the most significant innovations of the late twentieth century. The development of the microprocessor, first introduced in 1971 by Intel, represented a notable advance in the technology of integrated circuitry. A microprocessor miniaturized the central processing unit (CPU) of a computer, making it possible for a small machine to perform calculations that in the past only very large machines could do. Considerable technological innovation was needed before the microprocessor could actually become the basis of what was first known as a “minicomputer” and later a personal computer or “PC.” In 1977, Apple launched its Apple II personal computer, the first such machine to be widely available to the public. Several years later, International Business Machines (IBM) entered the personal computer market with the first PC. So that it could focus its internal resources on developing computer hardware, IBM had engaged a small software development company, Microsoft, to design an operating system for its new computer. No PC could operate without it. The PC, and its software, made its debut in August 1981 and immediately became enormously successful. Three years later, Apple introduced its Macintosh computer. For a time, Apple could not match IBM’s marketing power. By the late-1980s, the PC had established its dominance in the booming personal computer market, but IBM was replaced by Microsoft as the dominant computer company in the world. The computer revolution created thousands of new, lucrative businesses: computer manufacturers themselves, makers of the tiny silicon chips that ran the computers, and makers of software.

The Internet
 Out of the computer revolution emerged another dramatic source of information and communication: the Internet—a vast, geographically far-flung network of computers that allows people to communicate with others all over the world. It had its beginning in 1963, in the U.S. government’s Advanced Research Projects Agency (ARPA), which funneled federal funds into scientific research projects. In the early 1960s, J. C. R. Licklider, the head of ARPA’s Information Processing Techniques Office, launched a program to link together computers over large distances. It was known as ARPANET. For several years, ARPANET served mainly as a way for groups of people to exchange information and collaborate with one another through the remote use of a small handful of computer networking facilities. Gradually, however, both the size and the uses of the network expanded. Two new important technologies made ARPANET’s expansion possible. The first was a system for transmitting large quantities of data in “packets” that took advantage of ARPANET’s indirect structure. The second was the development of the Transmission Control Protocol/Internet Protocol (TCP/IP), which not only provided a way to deliver addresses to machines and networks but also provided protection against lost data packets on the network. By 1971, ARPANET linked twenty-three computers, which served mostly research labs and universities. Gradually, interest in the system began to spread and the number of devices connected to it grew. In the early 1980s, the Defense Department, an early partner in the development of ARPANET, withdrew from the project for security reasons. The network, soon renamed the Internet, was then free to develop independently. In 1989, Tim Berners-Lee, a British scientist working at a laboratory in Geneva, introduced the World Wide Web, which helped establish an orderly system for both the distribution and retrieval of electronic information over the Internet. By 2012, there were well over a

804 • CHAPTER 32


 The digital revolution has contributed to a vast change in the reporting of news events and political commentary. Politicians now have much less control over how their messages are transmitted and received. (© Ian Dagnall/Alamy) TWENTY-FOUR-HOUR NEWS CYCLE

 billion computers in use in the world (and many more now-obsolete ones). Virtually all of them are connected to the Internet. The development of the Internet, along with the emergence of the computer industry and digital technology, made possible an enormous range of new products and services that quickly became central to economic life: digital music, video, and cameras; iPods, smartphones, and tablets; and Facebook, Instagram, YouTube, and Vine. These modern industries employed hundreds of thousands of people (many of them from outside the United States) and created new consumer needs and appetites.

Breakthroughs in Genetics
 Computers helped create new scientific breakthroughs in genetics. Early discoveries in genetics by Gregor Mendel, Thomas Hunt Morgan, and others laid the groundwork for more dramatic breakthroughs—the discovery of DNA by the British scientists Oswald Avery, Colin MacLeod, and Maclyn McCarty in 1944; and in 1953, the dramatic discovery by the American biochemist James Watson and the British biophysicist Francis Crick of the double-helix structure of DNA, and thus of the key to identifying genetic codes. From these discoveries emerged the new science—and, ultimately, the new industry—of genetic engineering, through which new medical treatments and new techniques for hybridization of plants and animals have already become possible. Scientists began to identify specific genes in humans and other living things. But the identification of genes was painfully slow; and in 1989, in an effort to accelerate the process, the federal government appropriated $3 billion to fund the National Center for Human Genome Project the Human Genome. The Human Genome Project formally began its mission to identify and classify all of the more than 100,000 genes in 1990 and declared its work complete in 2003. But genetic research was (and continues to be) a source of great controversy. Many people feared that the new science might alter aspects of human life that previously seemed beyond human control. Some critics opposed genetic research on religious grounds, seeing it as an interference with “God’s plan” for human nature. Still others complained

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 805 

 that it equipped humans with immoral powers such that, for example, parents could “design” their children and “order” certain desirable traits. And a particularly heated controversy emerged over the ways in which scientists obtained genetic material. One of the most promising sources of genetic research comes from stem cell material from human embryos, but the research deeply offends those who believe that the embryo is an earlyaged human life deserving of protection from harm. In 2001, President Bush issued an executive order banning federal funding of research using new sources of human stem cells. President Obama reversed the order in 2009.

A CHANGING SOCIETY
 The American population changed dramatically in the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries. It grew larger, older, and more racially and ethnically diverse. It debated the success and scope of earlier landmark events, such as the civil rights movement and the right to an abortion. At the same time, the nation’s citizenry confronted powerful new challenges, such as the spread of AIDS, the debate over gay rights and same-sex marriage, and the prospect of dwindling natural resources.

A
Shifting Population  Decreasing birthrates and growing life spans contributed to one of the most important characteristics of the American population in the early twenty-first century: its increasing agedness. The enormous “Baby-Boom” generation—people born in the first ten years after World War II—drove the median age steadily upward (from 34 in 1996 to 37 in 2011 to a projected 39 by 2035). It had important implications for the workforce. In the last twenty years of the twentieth century, the number of people aged 25–54 (known statistically as the prime workforce) grew by over 26 million. In the first ten years of the twenty-first century, the number of American-born workers in that age group did not grow at all. This combination of fewer Americans working and more of them retired put enormous stress on the Social Security and Medicare systems to continue to fulfill their financial obligations. The slowing growth of the native-born population, and the workforce shortages it helped create, was one reason for the rapid growth of immigration. In 2011, the number of foreignborn residents of the United States was the highest in American history—more than 40 million people. These immigrants came from a wider variety of backgrounds than ever before, as a result of the 1965 Immigration Reform Act, which eliminated national origins as a criterion for admission. The growing presence of the foreign-born contributed to a significant drop in the percentage of white residents in the United States—from 90 percent in 1965 to 80 percent in 2008. (Relative to the overall population, non-Hispanic whites constituted just over 65 percent.) Latinos and Asians were by far the largest groups of immigrants in these years. But others came in significant numbers from Africa, the Middle East, Russia, and eastern Europe.

African Americans in the Post–Civil Rights Era
 The civil rights movement and other liberal efforts of the 1960s had two very different effects on African Americans. On one hand, they increased opportunities for advancement to those in a position to take advantage of them. And they helped make possible the election of the first black American to the White House, an event unthinkable to all but

806 • CHAPTER 32




14.0%




10.0%
8.0%
6.0%
4.0%




 Immigrant share of the total U.S. population

 Number of immigrants (in millions)

12.0%


2.0%


 Number of immigrants Immigrant share of the total U.S. population

0.0%


















 This chart shows the tremendous increase in immigration to the United States in the decades since the Immigration Reform Act of 1965. • At what point since 1850 was the immigrant share of the total U.S. population highest? When was the last time that the immigrant share was at its current level? (Source of data: Migration Policy Institute and U.S. Census Bureau.) U.S. IMMIGRANT POPULATION AND SHARE OVER TIME, 1850–PRESENT

 the most optimistic freedom fighter during the King years. On the other hand, as the industrial economy declined and government services dwindled, there was a growing sense of helplessness and despair among large groups of poor nonwhites who continued to find themselves barred from upward mobility. By the early twenty-first century, the black middle class constituted over half of the African Growth of Black Middle Class American population; progress was remarkable in the decades after the high point of the civil rights movement. Disparities between black and white professionals did not vanish, but they diminished substantially. African American families moved into more affluent urban communities and, in many cases, into suburbs—at times as neighbors of whites, more often into predominantly black communities. The percentage of black high school graduates going on to college was virtually the same as that of white high school graduates by the early twenty-first century (although a smaller proportion of blacks than whites managed to complete high school). And African Americans were making rapid strides in many professions. A generation earlier, they had been barred from many jobs because of segregation. Over half of all employed African Americans in the United States had skilled white-collar jobs in 2010. There were few areas of American life from which blacks were any longer entirely excluded. But the rise of the black middle class also accentuated the increasingly desperate plight of less fortunate African Americans. Economic growth and the activist programs of the 1960s and beyond had never reached them. A third of the nation’s black population was categorized as impoverished, often described as the “underclass.” As more successful Plight of Impoverished People blacks moved out of the inner cities, the poor were left behind in their decaying ­neighborhoods. Less than half of young inner-city blacks f­inished high

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 807 

 school in 2010; more than 60 percent were unemployed. The black family structure changed as well from the dislocations of urban poverty. There was a radical increase in the number of single-parent, female-headed black households. In 1970, 59 percent of all black children under eighteen years old lived with both their parents (already down from 70 percent a decade earlier). In 2010, only 35 percent of black children lived in such households, compared to 77 percent of non-Hispanic white children. Nonwhites were also disadvantaged by many other factors in the changing social and economic climate of the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries. Among them was Clinton’s revision of federal welfare policies and a growing impatience with affirmative action. There was also a steady decline in the number of unskilled jobs in the economy. Not surprisingly, then, many blacks openly questioned the long-term successes of the civil rights movement. A steady rise in the rate of the incarceration of young black men prompted calls for better schools and intervention programs as well as a review of the justice system as a whole. Signs of popular despair surfaced during moments of racial tension, especially after the use of questionable policing tactics left black men dead, as in the case of Eric Garner in New York City in July 2014 and eighteen-year-old Michael Brown in Ferguson, Missouri, in August 2014. In these highly publicized cases, hundreds of blacks took to the streets, demanding fairer treatment by local police and decrying a lack of racial respect between Americans of different colors.

The Abortion Debate
 Among the principal goals of the growing power of conservatism as it became more assertive in the late twentieth century was a challenge to feminism and its achievements. Leaders of the New Right had campaigned successfully against the proposed Equal Rights Amendment to the Constitution. And they played a central role in the most divisive issue of the late 1980s and 1990s: abortion rights. For women who choose to terminate unwanted pregnancies, the Supreme Court’s decision in Roe v. Wade (1973) had seemed to settle the question. By the 1980s, abortion was the most commonly performed surgical procedure in the country. But at the same time, critics of abortion began to build a powerful grassroots movement. The “right-to-life” or “pro-life” movement, as it called itself, found its most fervent s­upporters among Catholics; and Right-to-Life Movement indeed, the Catholic Church itself lent its institutional authority to the battle against legalized abortion. Religious doctrine also motivated the anti-abortion stance of Mormons, evangelical Christians, and other groups. The opposition of other anti-abortion activists had less to do with religion than with their commitment to traditional notions of family and gender relations. To them, abortion was a particularly offensive part of a much larger assault by feminists on the role of women as wives and mothers. It was also, many foes contended, a form of murder. Fetuses, they claimed, were human beings who had a “right to life” from the moment of conception. Although the right-to-life movement was persistent in its demand for a reversal of Roe v. Wade or, barring that, a constitutional amendment banning abortion, it also attacked abortion in more-limited ways and at its most vulnerable points. Starting in the late 1970s, Congress and many state legislatures began barring the use of public funds to pay for abortions, thereby making them almost inaccessible for many poor women in some states. The Reagan and the two Bush administrations imposed further restrictions on federal funding and even on the right of doctors in federally funded clinics to give patients any information on abortion. Extremists in the right-to-life movement began picketing, occupying, and at rare times even bombing abortion clinics. Several anti-abortion activists murdered doctors who performed abortions; others subjected physicians to campaigns of terrorism and harassment. The shifting composition of the Supreme Court between 1981

808 • CHAPTER 32


 and 2010 (during which time new conservative justices were appointed to the Court) renewed the right-to-life movement’s hopes for a reversal of Roe v. Wade. The changing judicial climate of the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries mobilized defenders of abortion as never before. They called themselves the “pro-choice” Pro-Choice Movement movement because they were defending not so much abortion itself as every woman’s right to choose whether and when to bear a child. The pro-choice movement was in many parts of the country at least as strong as, and in some areas much stronger than, the right-to-life movement. With the election of President Clinton in 1992, a vocal supporter of “choice,” the immediate threat to Roe v. Wade faded. Clinton’s reelection in 1996 was evidence that the prochoice movement maintained considerable political strength. But abortion rights remained highly vulnerable. Clinton’s successor, George W. Bush, openly opposed abortion. Whereas Clinton had refused to sign the Partial-Birth Abortion Ban Act, Bush, to great fanfare, inked it into law in 2003. The legislation forbade physicians from performing a medical procedure called “intact dilation and extraction.” The Supreme Court upheld the constitutionality of the law in Gonzales v. Carhart in 2007. Barack Obama supported the right to abortion when he became president, but judicial struggles over whether and to what extent society has an obligation to protect it continued. In 2007, the state of Massachusetts amended its Reproductive Health Facility Act (originally passed in 2003) to create a 35-foot buffer zone around reproductive centers that offered abortions. Its intent was to provide patients entering an abortion clinic a greater measure of safety and relief from confrontational protesters. The Supreme Court, however, declared this law unconstitutional in 2014. In McCullen v. Coakley, the Court ruled that the 35-foot protective zone violated the right of aborMcCullen v. Coakley tion opponents to protest peacefully and unfairly limited their free speech.

 AIDS and Modern America Two new and deadly epidemics ravaged many American communities beginning in the 1980s. One was a dramatic increase in drug use, which penetrated nearly every community in the nation. The enormous demand for drugs, and particularly for “crack” cocaine in the late 1980s and early 1990s, spawned what was in effect a multibillion-dollar industry. Drug use declined significantly among middle-class people beginning in the late 1980s, largely because of educational campaigns, but the epidemic declined much more slowly in the poor urban neighborhoods, where it was doing the most severe damage. The drug epidemic was related to another scourge of the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries: the rapid spread of a new and lethal disease first documented in 1981 and soon named AIDS (acquired immune deficiency syndrome). AIDS is the product of the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), which is transmitted by the exchange of bodily fluids (blood or semen). The virus gradually destroys the body’s immune system and makes its victims highly vulnerable to a number of diseases (particularly to various forms of cancer and pneumonia) to which they would otherwise have a natural resistance. During the early history of the disease, those infected with the virus (that is, those who identified as “HIV-positive”) and became ill were almost certain to die. The first American victims of AIDS (and for many years the group among whom cases remained the most numerous) were gay men. But by the late 1980s, as the gay community began to implement aggressive education and intervention programs, the most rapid increase in the spread of the disease occurred among heterosexuals, many of them intravenous drug users who spread the virus by sharing contaminated hypodermic needles.

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 809 

 In the mid-1990s, AIDS researchers, after years of frustration, finally began discovering effective treatments for the disease. By taking a combination of powerful drugs on a rigorous schedule, among them a group known as protease inhibitors, even people with advanced cases of AIDS experienced dramatic improvement—so much so that in many cases there were no measurable quantities of the virus left in their bloodstreams. Currently a diagnosis of AIDS is not the near-certain death sentence it was in the late nineties; rather, new medication regimes permit those living with AIDS to successfully manage the disease and live mostly normal lives. Every president has steadily increased federal funding for AIDS research and education and for the care of individuals living with AIDS, both domestically and abroad. President George W. Bush provided $15 billion to fight AIDS in Africa, where the epidemic was rampant and the poor had little access to drugs. In the budget for 2015, President Obama called for $30.4 billion to combat AIDS. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) estimates that 1.3 million Americans currently suffer from AIDS, nearly one in seven not even realizing that they are infected. But the United States represents only a tiny proportion of the worldwide total of people afflicted with HIV, an estimated 35 million people. Over two-thirds of those cases are concentrated in Africa.

Gay Americans and Same-Sex Marriage
 In the late twentieth century, inspired in part by the success of AIDS activists in winning political support and funding, many gay men and lesbians began to lobby for greater protections under the law, particularly the right to marry. Until the 1990s, the issue of same-sex marriage was not a national political issue. But in 1993, Hawaii’s Supreme Court ruled in Baehr v. Lewin that the state needed a compelling reason to bar same-sex ­marriage. In response, Congress easily passed the Defense of Marriage Act (DOMA) in 1996 DOMA with rare bipartisan support. President Clinton signed it into law. DOMA exempted states from being required to recognize same-sex marriages from other states. It also defined marriage as being between a man and a woman and denied same-sex married couples the ability to be classified as “spouses” for federal purposes, such as the filing of joint tax returns, Social Security survivor benefit claims, adoption papers, and immigration applications. Gay rights activists identified more than 1,000 protections and responsibilities of marriage denied them by DOMA. Thirty states quickly followed suit with similar laws. Almost immediately, gay men and lesbians and their supporters took to the courts in protest. They typically argued that DOMA and related state laws violated the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment of the U.S. Constitution. They gained many victories. By 2013, eleven states had passed new legislation making same-sex marriage legal. That year as well the U.S. Supreme Court struck down the section of DOMA defining marriage as being between two people of the opposite sex, so that all married couples living in states where same-sex marriage is legal are classified as spouses by the federal government. The tide against same-sex marriage appeared to be turning. By early 2015, state and federal courts had overturned legal barriers to same-sex marriage in twenty-six states. Finally, on June 26, 2015, the Supreme Court, in a close 5-4 decision, ruled that the ability of same-sex couples to marry was a right guaranteed by the Constitution. Writing for the majority, Justice Anthony Kennedy proclaimed that “No longer may this liberty be denied.” Driving the radical change in the legal status of same-sex marriage, in addition to the guidance and political savvy of its advocates, was a profound shift in public opinion about the issue. Indeed, broad popular support for same-sex marriage grew steadily since the

CO NS IDER T HE S O URC E
SAME-SEX MARRIAGE, 2015
 The debate over the right of people of the same sex to marry legally and enjoy the full range of benefits accorded to married couples under federal and state law hit a fever pitch in early January 2015. Nearly four years earlier, Cari Searcy and Kimberly McKeand, a same-sex couple who were legally married in California under that state’s laws, wanted Searcy to be able to adopt McKeand’s eight-year-old biological son, under a provision of Alabama’s adoption code that allows a person to adopt her “spouse’s child.” But Searcy’s petition was denied in December 2011 based on the Alabama Sanctity of Marriage Amendment and the closely related Alabama Marriage Protection Act. Both laws declared that “Marriage is inherently a unique relationship between a man and a woman,” that “No marriage license shall be issued in the State of Alabama to parties of the same sex,” and that “The State of Alabama shall not recognize as valid any marriage of parties of the same sex that occurred or was alleged to have occurred as a result of the law of any jurisdiction regardless of whether a marriage license was issued.” Therefore, because Alabama does not recognize the legality of same-sex plaintiffs’ marriage, Searcy failed to qualify as a “spouse” for adoption purposes. Searcy appealed the denial of her adoption petition to the Alabama Court of Civil Appeals, which ruled against her and affirmed the decision of the probate court. In federal court, Searcy sued the attorney general of Alabama, Luther Strange, and sought to declare these two Alabama state laws unconstitutional on the grounds that they violated the due-process clause and equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment. Callie Granade, a federal judge for the U.S. District Court in Alabama (Southern Division), agreed in January 2015. She ordered the state to begin to issue marriage licenses to same-sex 810 •

 couples immediately, though the order was delayed while Attorney General Strange appealed to the U.S. Supreme Court for a stay. But once the High Court refused to hear the case, on February 9, Granade’s order took effect. Some counties obliged, but others didn’t, heeding the ­encouragement of Alabama’s Supreme Court justice, Roy Moore, to ignore the federal ruling. Then, in March 2015, the state’s Supreme Court ruled 7 to 1 that all probate justices (county officials officially charged with the management of marriage licenses) must cease issuing marriage licenses to same-sex couples. In June, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that gay marriage bans such as Alabama's were unconstitutional. In the following excerpt from Judge Granade’s ruling, she clarifies why she ruled in favor of same-sex marriage. Defendant contends that Alabama has a ­legitimate interest in protecting the ties between children and their biological parents and other biological kin. However, the Court finds that the laws in question are not narrowly tailored to fulfill the reported interest. The Attorney General does not explain how allowing or recognizing same-sex marriage between two consenting adults will prevent heterosexual parents or other biological kin from caring for their biological children. He proffers no justification for why it is that the provisions in question single out same-sex couples and prohibit them, and them alone, from marrying in order to meet that goal. Alabama does not exclude from marriage any other couples who are either unwilling or unable to biologically procreate. There is no law prohibiting infertile couples, elderly couples, or couples who do not wish to procreate from marrying. Nor does the state prohibit recognition of marriages between such couples from other states. The attorney general fails to demonstrate any rational, much less

 compelling, link between its prohibition and non-recognition of same-sex marriage and its goal of having more children raised in the biological family structure the state wishes to promote. There has been no evidence presented that these marriage laws have any ­effect on the choices of couples to have or raise children, whether they are same-sex couples or opposite-sex couples. In sum, the laws in question are an irrational way of promoting biological relationships in Alabama. . . . If anything, Alabama’s prohibition of same-sex marriage detracts from its goal of promoting optimal environments for children. Those children currently being raised by same-sex parents in Alabama are just as worthy of protection and recognition by the State as are the children being raised by opposite-sex parents. Yet Alabama’s Sanctity laws harms the children of same-sex couples for the same reasons that the [U.S.] Supreme Court found that the Defense of Marriage Act harmed the children of samesex couples. Such a law “humiliates . . . thousands of children now being raised by same-sex couples. The law in question makes it even more difficult for the children to understand the integrity and closeness of their own family and its concord with other families in their community and in their daily lives.” [Windsor, 133 S. Ct. at 2694] Alabama’s prohibition and non-recognition of samesex marriage "also brings financial harm to children of same-sex couples,” [id at 2695] because it denies the families of these ­children a panoply of benefits that the State

 and the federal government offer to families who are legally wed. Additionally, these laws further injures those children of all couples who are themselves gay or lesbian, and who will grow up knowing that Alabama does not believe they are as capable of creating a family as their heterosexual friends. For all of these reasons, the court finds that Alabama’s marriage laws violate the Due Process Clause and Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution. UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, & EVALUATE 1. How does Judge Granade’s ruling re-

 flect—or not reflect—changing popular attitudes toward gay men and lesbians? 2. How is the definition of a “family” being redefined? 3. In what ways do the actions of Judge Roy Moore and the Alabama Supreme Court evoke tensions ­between the state and civil rights ­protesters of the 1950s and 1960s? Or are the civil rights of black Americans and gay and lesbian Americans two very ­different issues? 4. In his dissenting opinion in Obergefell v. Hodges, Supreme Court Justice John Roberts said, “The fundamental right to marry does not include a right to make a state change its definition of marriage.” What does the decision in Searcy v. Strange have to say about the state’s definition of marriage?

 Source: Searcy v. Strange, Civil Action No. 14-0208-CG-N (S.D. Ala. Jan. 25, 2015), https://scholar.google.com/scholar_ case?case=14084561318965877067&hl=en&as_sdt=6&as_vis=1&oi=scholarr (accessed March 19, 2015).

 end of the twentieth century, primarily among younger generations of Americans. Still, there was no national consensus about the legality of same-sex marriage, and many southern and midwestern states had laws on the books preventing same-sex marriage or were engaged in heated legal battles over it. For example, in January 2015 in Alabama, a federal judge ruled in favor of same-sex marriage. (See “Consider the Source: Same-Sex Marriage, 2015.”) But less than two months later, Alabama’s Supreme Court, by a vote of 7 to 1, forbade county officials from issuing a marriage license to any same-sex couple. Ultimately the decision by the U.S. Supreme Court broke the legal stalement and compelled Alabama (and all states with gay marriage bans) to issue the licenses. • 811

AMERICA IN THE WORLD


The Global Environmental
Movement
 An international movement for well over a century, environmentalism has grown rapidly throughout the world in the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries. What began as a series of localized efforts to preserve wilderness sites and to clean up air and water has evolved into a broad effort to deal with concerns that affect, and threaten, the entire globe. During the 1960s, 1970s, and 1980s, while long-standing American environmental associations such as the Wilderness Society, the Sierra Club, and the National Audubon Society were being rejuvenated, organizations elsewhere in the world sought to create an international environmental movement. The World Wildlife Fund (WWF), created in Switzerland in 1961, eventually attracted more than 5 million supporters in over 150 countries and now claims to be the world’s largest independent conservation organization. Greenpeace was founded in Canada in 1971 to oppose U.S. nuclear testing off the coast of Alaska. It, too, has grown into an international organization, with 2.8 million financial supporters worldwide and a presence in forty nations. Nongovernmental organizations (NGOs) such as Greenpeace and WWF were not the only institutions to recognize environmental concerns. In June 1972, the United Nations (UN) held its first Conference on the Human Environment in Stockholm, Sweden. Representatives of 113 countries attended the conference to discuss issues of global environmental importance—­ including the role of chlorofluorocarbons (CFCs), a chemical compound used in refrigerants and aerosol sprays, in depleting the ozone layer. After the conference, the UN 812 •

 created the United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP) to help coordinate ­international efforts for environmentalism and encourage sustainable development in poorer nations around the world. The world’s first “Green” parties—political parties explicitly devoted to environmental concerns (and often to other issues of social justice)—appeared in 1972, beginning in New Zealand (the Values Party) and Tasmania (the United Tasmania Group). Since then, Green parties have proliferated throughout the world, including in the United States. The most powerful Green party to date has been Die Grünen in Germany, founded in 1980. Die Grünen allied with the Social Democratic Party in a governing coalition from 1998, and in 2000, this coalition successfully passed the Nuclear Exit Law, which set a timetable of twenty years for Germany’s eventual abandonment of nuclear power and a switch to renewable energy. Large-scale ecological catastrophes have often helped galvanize the global environmental movement. Among the more significant of these events was the Bhopal disaster of 1984, in which a gas leak at a Union Carbide pesticide plant in Bhopal, India, ­resulted in the deaths of between 3,000 and 15,000 people. Two years later, a nuclear reactor accident in the Soviet city of Chernobyl, in Ukraine, caused fifty-six direct deaths, with predictions of many thousands more deaths to follow as a result of exposure. The area around Chernobyl itself is expected to be partially contaminated for 24,000 years, the radioactive half-life of plutonium-239. A less catastrophic nuclear accident at Three Mile Island, Pennsylvania, in 1979 heightened antinuclear sentiment in the United

 States. In 1989, the oil tanker Exxon Valdez ran aground on Bligh Reef in Prince William Sound, Alaska, and spilled approximately 10.9 million gallons of crude oil. Eventually covering thousands of square miles of ocean water (and 1,300 miles of Alaska shoreline) in oil, the spill killed hundreds of thousands of animals instantly and devastated the fragile ecosystem of the sound. The 2010 explosion of the Deepwater Horizon well about 50 miles southeast of the Mississippi Delta caused the largest marine oil spill in history. In developed, industrialized nations, environmental advocacy has largely focused on energy policy, conservation, clean technologies, and changing individual and social attitudes about consumption (as in the recycling movement). The growth of environmentalism is often linked to issues of human and democratic rights and freedom from First World exploitation. For example, the Green Belt Movement in Kenya, begun in 1977 by Wangari Maathai, encouraged Kenyan women to plant over 30 million trees across the nation to address the challenges of ­deforestation, soil erosion, and lack of water. The Green Belt Movement became an important human rights and women’s rights organization, focused on reducing poverty and promoting peaceful democratic change through environmental conservation and protection. Maathai won the 2004 Nobel Peace Prize for her achievements. Over the past two decades, the environmental movement has grown even more global in scope, with multilateral environmental treaties and worldwide

 summits becoming the principal strategies of advocates. In 1997, an international effort to reduce global warming by mandating the lowering of greenhouse gas emissions culminated in the Kyoto Protocol (which the United States did not join). While the George W. Bush administration rejected most efforts to limit carbon emissions, other leading Americans helped bring the issue of global warming to wide attention both in the United States and around the world. Perhaps most notable has been former vice president Al Gore, whose 2006 film An Inconvenient Truth may have done more to raise awareness of the threat of global warming than any other recent event—both in the United States and in many other nations. As a result of his efforts, Gore won the 2007 Nobel Peace Prize—an honor he shared with others, appropriately, given the global character of the movement he has championed. His cowinner was the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, launched in Switzerland in 1988 and affiliated with the United Nations.

•


UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, & EVALUATE
 1. Why are environmental movements in

 developing nations often linked to issues of human rights and protection from exploitation by developed nations? How do developed nations threaten the environment of developing nations? 2. What is the current status of UN initiatives to reduce carbon omissions, such as the Kyoto Protocol?

The Contemporary Environmental Movement
 The environmental movement in the United States continued to expand in the decades after the 1980s. It drew inspiration from the older international environmental movement, which organized in the 1960s and steadily grew in political power. (See “America in the World: The Global Environmental Movement.”) After the first Earth Day, domestic environmental issues gained increasing attention and support. Although the federal government displayed only intermittent interest in the subject, environmentalists won a series of significant battles, mostly at the local level. They blocked the construction of • 813

814 • CHAPTER 32


 roads, airports, and other projects that they claimed would be ecologically dangerous, taking advantage of new legislation protecting endangered species and environmentally fragile regions. In the late 1980s, the environmental movement began to mobilize around a new and ominous challenge—“global warming.” It produced a steady rise in the earth’s temperature as a result of emissions from the burning of fossil fuels (most notably coal and oil). Although considerable controversy has continued for years over the pace, and even the reality, of global warming, by the early twenty-first century a growing consensus began to emerge—in part as a result of the leadership of significant public figures, such as former vice president Al Gore, who won a Nobel Peace Prize in 2007 for his efforts to draw attention to the problem. In 1997, representatives of the major industrial nations met in Kyoto, Japan, and agreed to a broad treaty establishing steps toward reducing carbon emissions and thus slowing or reversing global warming. The Clinton administration formally signed the Kyoto Protocol, but nothing came of it. Reading the handKyoto Protocol writing on the wall, Clinton never even submitted it for ratification because the Senate had earlier passed the Byrd-Hagel Resolution by a vote of 95 to 0 that rejected the treaty’s key tenets. President George W. Bush, while proclaiming grave concern over climate concern, refused to support the Kyoto Protocol because it excluded developing countries like China and India. Since 2009, President Obama has met with mixed success on climate change issues. While major international agreements have not materialized during his presidency, the president did champion and sign legislation ­raising fuel efficiency in passenger cars and trucks in 2012 and has since directed the Environmental Protection Agency to regulate coal ash, a major CO2 emitter primarily used in creating electricity, to intense political scrutiny.

DEEPWATER HORIZON DISASTER
In 2010, a BP (British Petroleum) offshore well, Deepwater Horizon, suffered a crippling explosion that sent approximately 5 million barrels of oil into the Gulf of Mexico. This photograph shows the attempt to cap the well. The oil leaked for months, destroying local fisheries, and the effects to the environment from the oil and the dispersants used to clean it up are still unknown. The event galvanized the global environmental movement. (© Julie Dermansky/Corbis) 
THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 815 

AMERICA IN THE WORLD
 The celebration of the beginning of a new millennium on January 1, 2000, was an important moment not just because of the change in the calendar. It was notable above all as a global event—a shared and for the most part joyous experience that united the world in its exuberance. But if the millennium celebrations suggested the bright promise of an interconnected world, other events at the dawn of the new century suggested its dark perils. Indeed, the United States’ increasing role as an economic and military superpower triggered fears among many Americans about a foreign policy that was too aggressive and trade initiatives that took advantage of low-wage workers in other countries and unfairly benefited large international businesses. The rise of mass protests over America’s global economic policies and terrorism painfully brought home the dangers of living in the twenty-first century.

Opposing the “New World Order”
 In the United States and other industrial nations, opposition to globalization—or to what President George H. W. Bush once called the “new world order”—took several forms. To many Americans on both the political left and right, the nation’s increasingly interventionist foreign policy was deeply troubling. Critics on the left charged that the United States was using military action to advance its economic interests—in the 1991 Gulf War and, above all, in the Iraq War that began in 2003. Critics on the right criticized humanitarian interventions in Somalia in 1993 and the Balkans in the late 1990s as too costly and risky. Others complained that the United States was ceding its sovereignty to international organizations, such as United Nations–led peacekeeping missions. Labor unions insisted that the rapid expansion of free-trade agreements led to the export of jobs from advanced nations to less developed ones. Other groups attacked working conditions in new manufacturing countries on humanitarian grounds, arguing that the global economy was creating new classes of “slave laborers” working in conditions that few Western nations would tolerate. Environmentalists argued that globalization, in exporting industry to low-wage countries, also exported industrial pollution and toxic waste into nations that had no effective laws to control them, and contributed significantly to global warming. And still others opposed global economic arrangements on the grounds that they enriched and empowered large multinational corporations and threatened the freedom and autonomy of individuals and communities. Varied opponents of globalization found a common enemy in the multinational institutions that policed and advanced the global economy. Among them were the World Trade Organization, which monitored the enforcement of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) treaties of the 1990s; the International Monetary Fund (IMF), which controlled international credit and exchange rates; and the World Bank, which made money available for development projects in many countries. In November 1999, when leaders of leading industrial nations gathered for their annual meeting in Seattle, Washington, tens of thousands protested—most of them peacefully. But some of them clashed with police, smashed store windows, and all but paralyzed the city. A few months later, a smaller but still substantial demonstration disrupted meetings of the IMF and the World Bank in Washington, D.C. And in July 2001, at a meeting of the same leaders in Genoa, Italy, an estimated 50,000 demonstrators clashed violently with police in a melee that left one protester dead and several hundred injured. The participants in the meeting responded to the demonstrations by pledging $1.2 billion to fight the AIDS epidemic in developing countries, and by deciding to hold future meetings in remote locations far from major cities.

816 • CHAPTER 32


 Thousands of demonstrators rallied at the site of the 1999 World Trade Organization meeting to protest the WTO’s role in the globalization of the economy and, they believed, the exploitation of working people. They succeeded in postponing the opening of the conference. In this photograph, a protester faces Seattle police in a cloud of tear gas, waiting to be arrested. (© Andy Clark/Reuters/Corbis) PROTESTING THE WTO IN SEATTLE, 1999

Defending Orthodoxy
 Outside the industrialized West, the impact of globalization sparked other controversies. Many citizens of nonindustrialized nations resented the way the world economy had left them in poverty. In their view, the developed world exploited and oppressed them. In some parts of the nonindustrialized world—particularly in some of the Islamic nations of the Middle East—the increasing reach of globalization created additional grievances, rooted not just in economics but also in religion and culture. The Iranian Revolution of 1979, in which orthodox Muslims ousted a despotic government, was one of the first large and visible manifestations of a phenomenon that eventually reached across much of the Islamic world. It threatened the stability of the globe. Militants used isolated incidents of violence and mayhem, designed to disrupt societies and governments and to create fear among their peoples. Such tactics are known to the world as terrorism.

The Rise of Terrorism
 The term terrorism was used first during the French Revolution in the 1790s to describe the actions of radical Jacobins against the French government. It continued to be used intermittently throughout the nineteenth and early twentieth centuries to describe the use of violence as a form of intimidation against peoples and governments. But the widespread understanding of terrorism as an important fact of modern life is largely a product of the end of the twentieth century and the beginning of the twenty-first.

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 817 

 Acts of what came to be called terrorism have occurred in many parts of the world. Irish revolutionaries engaged in terrorism regularly against the English through much of the twentieth century. Jews used it in Palestine against the British before the creation of Israel, and Palestinians have used it frequently against Jews in Israel—particularly in the past several decades. Revolutionary groups in Italy, Germany, Japan, and France have engaged in terrorist acts intermittently over the past several decades. The United States, too, has experienced terrorism for many years, much of it against American targets abroad––including the bombing of the Marine barracks in Beirut in 1983; the explosion that brought down an American airliner over Lockerbie, Scotland, in 1988; the bombing of American embassies in 1998; and the assault on the U.S. naval vessel Cole in 2000. Terrorist incidents were relatively rare, Terrorist Incidents before 9/11 but not unknown, within the United States itself prior to September 11, 2001. Militants on the American left performed various acts of terror in the 1960s and early 1970s. In February 1993, a bomb exploded in the parking garage of the World Trade Center in New York, killing six people and causing serious, but not irreparable, structural damage to the towers. Several men connected with militant Islamic organizations were ­convicted of the crime. In April 1995, a van containing explosives blew up in front of a federal building in Oklahoma City, killing 168 people. Timothy McVeigh, a former Army soldier who had become part of a militant a­ ntigovernment movement of the American right, was convicted of the crime and eventually executed in 2001.

 SEPTEMBER 11, 2001 A New York City symbol stands against a sky filled with the thick smoke from the destruction of another American symbol, New York City’s World Trade Center towers, a few hours after terrorists crashed two planes into them. (© Daniel Hulshizer/AP Images)

818 • CHAPTER 32


 Most Americans, however, considered terrorism a problem mainly confined to other nations. One of the many results of the terrible events of September 11, 2001, was to jolt the American people out of their complacency and alert them to the presence of continuing danger. Predictably, that awareness increased dramatically in the years following September 11. New security measures changed the way in which Americans traveled. New government regulations altered immigration policies and affected the character of international banking. Warnings of possible new terrorist attacks created widespread tension and uneasiness.

The War on Terror
 In the aftermath of September 11, 2001, the United States government launched what President Bush called a “war on terror.” The attacks on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon, government intelligence indicated, had been planned and orchestrated by Middle Eastern agents of a powerful terrorist network known as Al Qaeda. Its leader, Osama bin Laden—until Osama bin Laden and Al Qaeda 2001 little known outside the Arab world—quickly became one of the most notorious figures in the world. The militant Taliban government of Afghanistan had sheltered and supported Al Qaeda previously, and most reports placed bin Laden in continued care. In 2001, NATO, led by the United States, began a sustained campaign of bombing against the regime and sent in ground troops. Afghanistan’s Taliban regime quickly collapsed, and its leaders—along with the Al Qaeda fighters allied with them—fled the capital, Kabul. American and anti-Taliban Afghan troops pursued them into the mountains but failed to capture bin Laden and the other leaders of his organization. American forces in Afghanistan rounded up several hundred people with suspected connections to the Taliban and Al Qaeda and moved these prisoners (and eventually Guantánamo ­others) to a facility at the American military base in Guantánamo, Cuba. They were among the first suspected terrorists to be handled under new standards established by the federal government in dealing with terrorism after September 11, 2001. They were held for months, and in some cases years, without access to lawyers, without facing formal charges, and were subjected to intensive interrogation, and at times torture. Many critics denounced the dangers to basic civil liberties that they believed the war on terror had created. Others argued that the new tactics were necessary to protect Americans. President Obama, in his first month in the White House, pledged to close the prison at Guantánamo. But he soon found that the promise was difficult to keep.

The Iraq War
 In his State of the Union address to Congress in January 2002, President Bush spoke of an “axis of evil,” which included the nations of Iraq, Iran, and North Korea—all countries with anti-American regimes that either possessed or were thought to be trying to acquire nuclear weapons. Although Bush did not say so at the time, many people around the world interpreted these words to mean that the United States would soon try to topple the government of Saddam Hussein in Iraq. For over a year, the Bush administration slowly built a public case for invading Iraq. Much of that case rested on two claims. One was that Iraq was supporting terrorist groups that were hostile to the United States. The other, and eventually the more important, was that Iraq either had or was developing what came to be known as “weapons of mass Weapons of Mass Destruction destruction,” which included nuclear weapons and agents of chemical and biological warfare. Less central to these arguments, at least in the United

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 819 

 States, was the charge that the Hussein government was responsible for major violations of human rights. Except for the last, none of these claims turned out to be accurate. In March 2003, American troops, with support from Great Britain and several other countries and partial authorization from the United Nations, invaded Iraq and quickly toppled the Hussein regime. Hussein himself went into hiding but was eventually captured in December 2003. He was executed in Iraq on December 30, 2006. In May 2003, shortly after the American capture of Baghdad, President Bush made a dramatic appearance on an aircraft carrier off the coast of California, where he declared victory in the Battle of Iraq, praised the military and allies in the war effort, and warned, weakly, of the “difficult work to do in Iraq” while standing in front of a large sign reading “Mission Accomplished.” In the following months, however, events in Iraq suggested that the mission had only just begun. Of the more than 4,800 American soldiers killed in Iraq as of 2014, over 4,000 of them died after the “mission accomplished” speech. And despite significant efforts by the United States and its allies to hand over authority to an Iraqi government and to restore order to the country, insurgents continued to disrupt the recovery with persistent attacks and terrorist actions throughout the fragile nation. Support for the war in the United States steadily declined in the years after the first claim of victory. The failure to find evidence of the weapons of mass destruction, whose existence the president had claimed, was a hammer blow to the war’s credibility. Another blow came from reports of the torture and humiliation of Iraqi prisoners by American soldiers Abu Ghraib at the Abu Ghraib prison in Baghdad and other sites in Iraq and around the world. The invasion of Iraq was the most visible evidence of a basic change in the structure of American foreign policy under the presidency of George W. Bush. Ever since the late 1940s, the containment policy had become the cornerstone of America’s role in the world. The United States had worked to maintain stability in the world by containing, but not often directly threatening or attacking, its adversaries. Even after the Cold War ended, the United States continued to demonstrate a level of constraint, despite its now unchallenged military preeminence. In the administrations of George H. W. Bush and Bill Clinton, for example, American leaders worked closely with the United Nations and NATO to achieve U.S. international goals and resisted taking unilateral military action. There had always been those who criticized these constraints. They believed that America should do more than maintain stability and should move actively to topple undemocratic regimes and destroy potential enemies of the United States. In the administration of George W. Bush, these critics took control of American foreign policy and began to reshape it. The legacy of containment was largely repudiated. Instead, the public Bush’s Foreign Policy Doctrine stance of the American government was that the United States had the right and the responsibility to fight tyranny and spread freedom throughout the world—not just by exhortation and example but also, when necessary, by military force. In Latvia in May 2005, President Bush spoke of the decision at the end of World War II not to challenge Soviet domination of Eastern Europe. That decision had rested on the belief that such a challenge would lead the United States into another war. The controversial agreement negotiated at Yalta in 1945 by Roosevelt, Churchill, and Stalin, which failed to end the Soviet occupation of Poland and other Eastern European nations, was, the president said, part of an “unjust tradition” by which powerful governments sacrificed the interests of small nations. “This attempt to sacrifice freedom for the sake of stability,” the president continued, “left a continent divided and unstable.” The lesson, Bush suggested, was that the United States and other great powers should value stability less and freedom more, and should be willing to take greater risks in the world to end tyranny and oppression.

820 • CHAPTER 32


 America after the Iraq War The end of the American combat role in Iraq was already under way in the last year of the Bush administration. Obama brought it to an end in 2010. At the same time, he comEscalation in Afghanistan mitted significant additional troops to the war in Afghanistan, where Americans had been fighting since 2001. Obama escalated the Afghan war in 2011. For almost ten years, a major goal of American foreign policy was to find Osama bin Laden, the head of Al Qaeda, the organization behind the destruction of 9/11. In May 2011, Navy Seals found and killed bin Laden. Shortly afterward, leaders from countries of the North Atlantic Treaty Organization drafted a plan for the withdrawal of international forces from Afghanistan and facilitated peace talks between the Afghan government and the Taliban. Obama ordered nearly all American troops to leave the country and cease combat operations by the close of 2014, in effect ending American involvement in the conflict. Despite the end of the Iraq War and the killing of bin Laden, conflict in the Middle East continued to dominate American foreign policy. Obama had appointed Hillary Clinton as his Hillary Clinton as Secretary of State secretary of state, and together they tried to create peace between Israel and Palestine—an effort that made little or no progress. Elsewhere they sought to improve relationships damaged by the Iraq War and to build new international trade opportunities as well. But increasing turmoil in the Middle East, and the growing power of China, created new challenges. The United States intervened in a civil war in Libya and helped end the regime of the long-standing leader Muammar Qadaffi. And in 2012, Obama and Clinton sought to stop Iran from creating nuclear weapons—an effort that remained unfinished.

 Unmanned combat air vehicles (UCAVs), also known as drones, have become weapons of choice during many U.S. military engagements throughout the world. Pilots operate these vehicles from remote sites, a practice that was unimaginable when the international laws of war were last drafted in 1949. In calling for an examination of this practice, critics have cited the unintended killing of civilians in Pakistan and the targeting of three American citizens by U.S. drones in Yemen, as well as the potential for foreign governments to develop drones and follow the American precedent. (© Kirsty Wigglesworth/AP Images) DRONES

THE AGE OF GLOBALIZATION
• 821 

 Syria, a country locked in violent civil war since 2011, experienced a new and terrifying level of bloodshed. Opponents of the Ba’ath government sought the Syrian Civil War ouster of President Bashar al-Assad and his repressive regime. Assad unleashed the army in response, killing an estimated 120,000 of his own people by September 2013. The ­displacement of hundreds of thousands of Syrians into neighboring countries threatened to further destabilize the region. Assad’s use of chemical weapons triggered a strong condemnation by the United States and its European allies. Working with Russia, a traditional ally of the Assad regime, the United States and Europe brokered a deal to remove the stockpile of chemical weapons from the country. Obama, aware of his nation’s unwillingness to become involved in another ground war, resisted calls for sending troops to dislodge Assad. The violent struggle continued in 2015 with no sign of abatement in sight. A key element in the Syrian conflict has been the rise of rebel groups committed not only to overthrowing the Assad government but also violently resisting Western backers of the ruling regime and attacking Western influence over traditional Islamic society. Most notably, ISIS (the Islamic State of Iraq and Syria), a powerful and deadly opposition force, has ISIS recently embarked on campaigns of terror against Western nations, including the public execution of American and British citizens uploaded to social media websites around the world. In 2015, ISIS serves as a symbol of the persistent instability of the region and a reminder of the continuing threat of terrorism. Turmoil in the Middle East and the threat of terrorism are not the only focal points of current American foreign policy. In a bold move that reignited memories of the Cold War, Russia, under the leadership of President Vladimir Putin, annexed the Vladimir Putin Ukrainian territory of Crimea in March 2014. Putin inserted military troops to support Russian separatists and quickly established a firm grip over the local government and untrammeled access to the city and Bay of Sevastopal, home to Russia’s Black Sea fleet. Ignoring a flurry of international peace initiatives and sanctions imposed by the United States, its allies, and the United Nations, Putin tightened his hold over Crimea and even implemented sanctions of his own: he eliminated most agricultural imports from countries opposing him. The relationship between Russia and America remains tense, with no resolution satisfactory to both countries over the issue of Crimea in sight. It reminds us that major conflicts between the United States and countries in central and eastern Europe did not end with the fall of the Berlin Wall or collapse of the Soviet Union but persist in the form of nations like Russia intent on aggressively expanding its sphere of international influence.

CONCLUSION
 The United States in the first decade of the twenty-first century was a nation beset with many problems and anxieties. U.S. foreign policy after the attacks of September 11, 2001, had not only divided the American people but had also deeply alienated much of the world. Crises in the Middle East made it impossible to ignore the persistent threat of terrorism and extremism while conflict with Russia brought back Cold War fears of instability in eastern and central Europe. The American economy was struggling as early as 2007 and, in the fall of 2008, experienced the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. By 2014 the economy had improved but some polls indicated a continuing sense of uncertainty about the future among many Americans. Gridlock continued at the federal level, making it difficult to achieve sweeping reform in several key areas. Political

822 • CHAPTER 32


 divisions—not only among politicians, but also among voters—were as great in 2015 as they had been in many years. The United States remains the wealthiest and most powerful nation in the world, and it continues to cherish great ideals and great hopes. Moving forward into an uncertain future, Americans are burdened with serious problems and great challenges, but they are also armed with extraordinary resilience and energy that has allowed the nation—through its long and turbulent history—to endure, to flourish, and to imagine and strive for a better future.

KEY TERMS/PEOPLE/PLACES/EVENTS
Affordable Care Act 800
Afghan war 820
AIDS 808
Al Qaeda 818
Barack Obama 796
Defense of Marriage Act
(DOMA) 809
George W. Bush 795


Great Recession
 of 2008 797 Guantánamo 818 Hillary Rodham Clinton 796 Human Genome Project 804 Iraq War 795

 new world order 815 9/11 attacks 817 Occupy Wall Street (OWS) 801 Osama bin Laden 818 Tea Party 800 terrorism 816 Vladimir Putin 821

RECALL AND REFLECT
 1. 	How has partisanship affected how presidents governed in the last twenty-five years? 2. 	How has America’s relationship to the rest of the world changed as a result of the war on

 ­terror and in particular the Iraq War? 3. 	How did the digital revolution affect the American economy? 4. 	What were the key causes of the Great Recession?

